Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2360
Public power and irrigation district funds; deposit of funds; rules and regulations.

The board of directors of any such district may from time to time adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations governing the handling of its funds by the treasurer or other designated officers of the district and otherwise governing the relationship between such district and its depository as shall not conflict with the express provisions of sections 77-2353 to 77-2361 or other provisions of law. It shall be the duty of the treasurer and all other officers thus designated or otherwise charged by law with the handling of funds of the district to comply with such rules and regulations.

Laws 1941, c. 160, § 2, p. 642;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2538;

R.S.1943, § 77-2360;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 73.